Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 10. Controlled Substances

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Drugs, Narcotics, and Poisons § 1 et seq.

Requiring submission to examination or test as violation of constitutional rights, 25 ALR2d 1407.

Entrapment to commit offense with respect to narcotics law, 33 ALR2d 883.

Availability of defense of entrapment where one accused of violation of narcotics law denies participation in offense, 61 ALR2d 677.

Right of action at common law for damage sustained by plaintiff in consequence of sale or gift of intoxicating liquor or habit-forming drugs to another, 75 ALR2d 833, 97 ALR3d 528.

Civil commitment of arrested narcotic addict, validity of statute providing for, 98 ALR2d 726.

Federal prosecutions based on manufacture, importation, transportation, possession, sale, or use of LSD, 22 ALR3d 1325.

Penal offense of sniffing glue or similar volatile intoxicants, 32 ALR3d 1438.

Free exercise of religion as defense to prosecution for narcotic or psychedelic drug offense, 35 ALR3d 939.

Giving, selling, or prescribing dangerous drugs as contributing to the delinquency of a minor, 36 ALR3d 1292.

Validity, construction, and application of statute prohibiting loitering for the purpose of using or possessing dangerous drugs, 48 ALR3d 1271.

Relief to owner of motor vehicle subject to state forfeiture for use in violation of narcotics laws, 50 ALR3d 172.

Marijuana, psilocybin, peyote or similar drugs of vegetable origin as narcotics for purposes of drug prosecution, 50 ALR3d 1164.

LSD, STP, MDA, or other chemically synthesized hallucinogenic or psychedelic substances as narcotics for purposes of drug prosecution, 50 ALR3d 1284.

Permitting unlawful use of narcotics in private home as criminal offense, 54 ALR3d 1297.

Review for excessiveness of sentence in narcotics case, 55 ALR3d 812.

Conviction of possession of illicit drugs found in premises of which defendant was in nonexclusive possession, 56 ALR3d 948.

Conviction of possession of illicit drugs found in automobile of which defendant was not sole occupant, 57 ALR3d 1319.

Validity and construction of statute creating presumption or inference of intent to sell from possession of specified quantity of illegal drugs, 60 ALR3d 1128.

Modern status of the law concerning entrapment to commit narcotics offense — state cases, 62 ALR3d 110.

Drug addiction or related mental state as defense to criminal charge, 73 ALR3d 16.

Sufficiency of prosecution proof that substance defendant is charged with possessing or selling, or otherwise unlawfully dealing in, is marijuana, 75 ALR3d 717.

Validity of state statute imposing mandatory sentence or prohibiting granting of probation or suspension of sentence for narcotics offenses, 81 ALR3d 1192.

Prosecutions based upon alleged illegal possession of instruments to be used in violation of narcotics laws, 92 ALR3d 47.

Constitutionality of state legislation imposing criminal penalties for personal possession or use of marijuana, 96 ALR3d 225.

Forfeitability of property under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute where amount of controlled substance seized is small, 6 ALR5th 652.

Delay in setting hearing date or in holding hearing as affecting forfeitability under Uniform Controlled Substances Act or similar statute, 6 ALR5th 711.

Entrapment as defense to charge of selling or supplying narcotics where government agents supplied narcotics to defendant and purchased them from him, 9 ALR5th 464.

Use of prior military conviction to establish repeat offender status, 11 ALR5th 218.

Validity, construction and application of state “drug kingpin” statutes, 30 ALR5th 121.

Propriety of stop and search by law enforcement officers based solely on drug courier profile, 37 ALR5th 1.

Sufficiency of random sampling of drug or contraband to establish jurisdictional amount required for conviction, 45 ALR5th 1.

What constitute “reasonable grounds” justifying arrest of narcotics suspect without warrant under § 104 (a) of Narcotics Control Act of 1956 (26 U.S.C. § 7607 (2) [repealed]), 6 ALR Fed 724.

Determination of duration of commitment of narcotic addict under provision of Narcotic Addict Rehabilitation Act 1966 (18 U.S.C. § 4253 (a)) that commitment shall be for indeterminate period of time not to exceed 10 years, but in no event in excess of maximum sentence that could otherwise have been imposed, 18 ALR Fed 854.

Administrative inspection and warrants under § 510 of Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention & Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. § 880), 19 ALR Fed 736.

Modern status of the law concerning entrapment to commit narcotics offense, 22 ALR Fed 731.

What constitutes unlawful conduct subject to federal statutes prohibiting drug-related activities aboard United States vessels (21 USC § 955 et seq.), 73 ALR Fed 586.

Availability of defense of duress or coercion in prosecution for violation of federal narcotics laws, 75 ALR Fed 722.

Sufficiency of evidence that possessor of marijuana had intent to distribute it, so as to violate
21 USC § 841 (a)(1) , 79 ALR Fed 113.

When may offender found guilty of multiple crimes under Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 USC §§ 841-851) be punished for only one offense, 80 ALR Fed 794.

Illegal drugs or narcotics involved in alleged offense as subject to discovery by defendant under Rule 16 of Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure, 109 ALR Fed 363.

28 C.J.S. Drugs and Narcotics § 1 et seq.

Article I

§ 35-7-1001.
Short title.

This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Wyoming Controlled Substances Act of 1971”.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.1.

Cross references. —

As to driving under the influence of controlled substances and suspension or revocation of licenses, see §§

31-5-233

,

31-7-126

,

31-7-127

.

For Wyoming Pharmacy Act, see §§

33-24-101

to

33-24-301

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Cited

in

Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981); Palato v. State, 988 P.2d 512,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 154

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 35-7-1002.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Administer” means directly applying a controlled substance, whether by injection, inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:

A practitioner (or by his authorized agent); or

The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.

“Agent” means an authorized person who acts on behalf of or at the direction of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser. It does not include a common or contract carrier, public warehouseman, or employee of the carrier or warehouseman;

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 45, § 2.

“Controlled substance” means a drug, substance, or immediate precursor in schedules I through V of article III;

“Counterfeit substance” means a controlled substance which, or the container or labeling of which, without authorization, bears the trademark, trade name, or other identifying mark, imprint, number or device, or any likeness thereof, of a manufacturer, distributor, or dispenser other than the person who in fact manufactured, distributed, or dispensed the substance;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive, or attempted transfer from one person to another of a controlled substance, whether or not there is an agency relationship;

“Dispense” means to deliver a controlled substance to an ultimate user or research subject by or pursuant to the lawful order of a practitioner, including the prescribing, administering, packaging, labeling, or compounding necessary to prepare the substance for that delivery;

“Dispenser” means a practitioner who dispenses, or his authorized agent;

“Distribute” means to deliver other than by administering or dispensing a controlled substance;

“Distributor” means a person who distributes;

“Drug” means:

Substances recognized as drugs in official United States Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official National Formulary, or any supplement to any of them;

Substances intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention of disease in man or animals;

Substances (other than food) intended to affect the structure or any function of the body of man or animals; and

Substances intended for use as a component of any article specified in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of this paragraph. It does not include devices or their components, parts or accessories.

“Immediate precursor” means a substance which the commissioner has found to be and by rule designates as being the principal compound commonly used or produced primarily for use, and which is an immediate chemical intermediary used or likely to be used in the manufacture of a controlled substance, the control of which is necessary to prevent, curtail, or limit manufacture;

“Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion or processing of a controlled substance, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extractions and chemical synthesis, and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its container. The term does not include the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling of a controlled substance:

By a practitioner as an incident to his administering or dispensing of a controlled substance in the course of his professional practice; or

By a practitioner, or by his authorized agent under his supervision, for the purpose of, or as an incident to, research, teaching, or chemical analysis and not for sale.

“Marihuana” means all parts of the plant of the genus Cannabis, whether growing or not; the seed thereof; the resin extracted from any part of the plant; and every compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the plant, its seeds or resin. It does not include the mature stalks of the plant, fiber produced from the stalks, oil or cake made from the seeds of the plant, any other compound, manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture or preparation of the mature stalks (except the resin extracted therefrom), fiber, oil or cake, or the sterilized seed of the plant which is incapable of germination;

“Narcotic drug” means any of the following, whether produced directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of vegetable origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis, or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis:

Opium and opiate, and any salt, compound, derivative, or preparation of opium or opiate;

Any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of the substances referred to in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, but not including the isoquinoline alkaloids of opium;

Opium poppy and poppy straw;

Coca leaves and any salt, compound, derivative or preparation of coca leaves, and any salt, compound, isomer, derivative, or preparation thereof which is chemically equivalent or identical with any of these substances, but not including decocainized coca leaves or extractions of coca leaves which do not contain cocaine or ecgonine.

“Opiate” means any substance having an addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability similar to morphine or being capable of conversion into a drug having addiction-forming or addiction-sustaining liability. It does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled under W.S.

35-7-1011

, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3-methoxy-n-methylmorphinian and its salts (dextro-methorphan). It does include its racemic and levorotatory forms;

“Opium poppy” means the plant of the species Papaver somniferum L., except its seeds;

“Person” means individual, corporation, government or governmental subdivision or agency, business trust, estate, trust, partnership or association, or any other legal entity;

“Poppy straw” means all parts, except the seeds, of the opium poppy, after mowing;

“Practitioner” means:

A physician, dentist, veterinarian, podiatrist, scientific investigator, or other person licensed, registered or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state;

A pharmacy, hospital or other institution licensed, registered, or otherwise permitted to distribute, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer a controlled substance in the course of professional practice or research in this state.

“Production” includes the manufacture, planting, cultivation, growing, or harvesting of a controlled substance;

“State” means the state of Wyoming;

“Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled substance for his own use or for the use of a member of his household or for administering to an animal owned by him or by a member of his household;

“Law enforcement officer” means any sheriff, undersheriff or sheriff’s deputy of any county of this state, any duly authorized municipal policeman of any city or town of this state, any member of the Wyoming highway patrol, any police officer of the University of Wyoming or any Wyoming community college who is a peace officer, any superintendent, assistant superintendent or full-time park ranger of a state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

, when acting within the boundaries of the state park, state recreation area, state archeological site or state historic site or when responding to a request to assist other law enforcement officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction, or any special agent employed by the commissioner under this act;

“Board” means the Wyoming state board of pharmacy;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of drugs and substances control;

“Drug paraphernalia” means all equipment, products and materials of any kind when used, advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use for manufacturing, converting, preparing, packaging, repackaging, storing, containing, concealing, injecting, ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing into the human body a controlled substance in violation of this act and includes:

Isomerization devices when used, advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in increasing the potency of any species of plant which is a controlled substance;

Quinine hydrochloride, mannitol and mannite when used, advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in diluting controlled substances;

Separation gins and sifters when used or advertised for use in removing twigs and seeds from or in otherwise cleaning or refining marihuana;

Objects when used, advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in injecting controlled substances into the human body;

The following objects when used, advertised for use, intended for use or designed for use in ingesting, inhaling or otherwise introducing marihuana, cocaine, hashish or hashish oil or any other controlled substance into the human body:

Metal, acrylic, glass, stone, plastic or ceramic pipes with or without screens, permanent screens, hashish heads or punctured metal bowls;

Carburetion tubes;

Carburetion masks;

Chamber pipes;

Carburetor pipes;

Electric pipes;

Air-driven pipes;

Chillums;

Bongs;

Ice pipes or chillers.

“This act” means W.S.

35-7-1001

through

35-7-1063

.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.2; Laws 1975, ch. 51, § 1; ch. 192, § 1; 1982, ch. 46, § 2; 1999, ch. 78, § 1; ch. 104, § 2; 2001, ch. 92, § 1; 2003, ch. 176, § 2; 2004, ch. 20, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2009, ch. 10, § 1; 2011, ch. 45, § 2; 2015 ch. 102, § 2, effective July 1, 2015; 2018 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2018.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xxiv), inserted “any superintendent, assistant superintendent or full-time park ranger of a state park or historic site who has qualified pursuant to W.S.

9-1-701

through

9-1-707

, when acting within the boundaries of the state park or historic site or when responding to a request to assist other law enforcement officers acting within the scope of their official duties in their own jurisdiction” following “community college who is a peace officer.”

Laws 2004, ch. 20, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 2, 2004.

The 2005 amendment

substituted “of the plant” for “or the plant” in (a)(xiv).

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2009 amendment,

in (a)(xxiv), inserted “state recreation area, state archeological site” twice, and inserted “state” preceding “historic site” twice.

Laws 2009, ch. 10, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 24, 2009.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (a)(iii) pertaining to the definition of bureau.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (a)(xxviii), substituted “through

35-7-1063

” for “through

35-7-1060

.”

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in the introductory language of (a)(i), substituted “directly applying” for “the direct application of” preceding “a controlled substance.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

“Deliver.” —

In a prosecution for delivery of a controlled substance, the definition of “deliver” in this section was not unconstitutionally vague as applied to defendant's conduct in handing cocaine to another at the request of a friend. Gallegos v. State, 961 P.2d 981,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 122

(Wyo. 1998).

Where police officers responded to a report that the odor of burning marijuana was emanating from an apartment where minors were present, defendant retrieved from her bedroom a wooden box containing a small amount of marijuana and other paraphernalia. The corporal testified that three juveniles admitted that they had smoked marijuana and defendant admitted that she supplied the drugs; the evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction for three felony counts of delivery of a controlled substance to a minor in violation of this section.
Anderson v. State, 2009 WY 119, 216 P.3d 1143,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2009).

Defendant constructively delivered controlled substance

where defendant set up the transaction, he asked the informant how much she wanted, he told her to accompany him to the back bedroom, and he brought out the methamphetamine which they snorted as well as the methamphetamine which the informant bought. Fortner v. State, 835 P.2d 1155,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 1992).

Drug paraphernalia. —

In a drug case, a trooper had probable cause to seize a box from defendant's vehicle where it was emblazoned on the top with what the trooper immediately recognized as an exact replica of a marijuana leaf, and therefore, the box's incriminating character as a stash box was immediately apparent. Vassar v. State, 2004 WY 125, 99 P.3d 987,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 161

(Wyo. 2004).

Marijuana. —

In a prosecution for illegal possession of marijuana, the court's definition of “marijuana” in the jury instructions was sufficient where the evidence presented at trial showed that the baggy contained marijuana leaf and thus fell within the definition of marijuana, and counsel inferred and presented evidence that the baggy contained “seeds and stems” and later argued to the jury that it was illogical for a person to attempt to sell a “bag of seeds and stems.” Leyva v. State, 2005 WY 22, 106 P.3d 873,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2005).

Conviction under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1031(a) for possessing marijuana, as defined by Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 35-7-1002(a)(xiv), with intent to distribute was supported by sufficient circumstantial evidence, including the marijuana stems and seeds, scale, pipes and bongs containing marijuana residue, baggies used to package marijuana, and $ 345 in cash found near defendant's
computer desk in his living room; his girlfriend's testimony that she saw him use and sell marijuana; the testimony of the girlfriend's brother that he purchased marijuana from and smoked it with defendant; defendant's admission to a detective that he possessed, used, and sold marijuana; and his testimony that the seeds and stems were what was left after he had finished smoking the pot just before he was arrested.
Shumaker v. State, 2007 WY 143, 167 P.3d 11,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2007).

Because the burden to establish an exception under the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act is on the person claiming the exception, defendant, who claimed to have possessed hemp, which is not a controlled substance, bore the burden of establishing that the substance was hemp, defined as cannabis with a tetrahydrocannabinol (THC) concentration of not more than 0.3 percent. Thus, sufficient evidence supported defendant’s conviction for possession of marijuana without evidence of THC concentration. Roman v. State, 2022 WY 48, 507 P.3d 453,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. 2022).

Applied

in

Eaton v. State, 660 P.2d 803,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 294

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Wright v. State, 670 P.2d 1090,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 373

(Wyo. 1983).

Cited

in

Apodaca v. State, 627 P.2d 1023,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1981); Dover v. State, 664 P.2d 536,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 334

(Wyo. 1983); Jelle v. State, 2005 WY 111, 119 P.3d 403,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 133

(2005).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: recovery for injury or death resulting from intentional inhalation of product's fumes or vapors to produce intoxicating or similar effect, 50 ALR5th 275.

What constitutes establishment of prima facie case for forfeiture of real property traceable to proceeds from sale of controlled substances under § 511(a)(6) of Comprehensive Drug Abuse Prevention and Control Act of 1970 (21 U.S.C. § 881(a)(6), 146 ALR Fed 597.

§ 35-7-1003.
Attorney general designated commissioner of drugs and substances control.

The attorney general of the state of Wyoming is hereby designated commissioner of drugs and substances control.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.3.

§ 35-7-1004.
Personnel to administer provisions.

The attorney general by and with the consent of the governor may employ such personnel as necessary to administer this act. Such personnel shall serve at the pleasure of the attorney general at such compensation as may be approved by the Wyoming personnel division. Said personnel shall be assigned such duties as may be necessary to assist the commissioner in the performance of his responsibilities under this act for the efficient operation of the work of the office.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.4.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1005.
Advisory board on drugs and substances control.

There is hereby established an advisory board on drugs and substances control for the purpose of assisting and advising the commissioner of drugs and substances control in carrying out the functions of his office. The members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation for their services except travel expenses and per diem in the same manner and amount as employees of the state of Wyoming. The advisory board consists of the director of the department of health or his designee, and the executive director and senior inspector of the Wyoming state board of pharmacy. In addition to any other duties imposed upon the advisory board by this or any other act, it is the duty of the board to advise the commissioner of drugs and substances control as to which substances shall be declared controlled drugs and substances subjected to the controls provided by law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.5; Laws 1975, ch. 192, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Article II

§ 35-7-1006.
Cooperation by state departments, officers, agencies and employees.

It shall be the duty of all departments, officers, agencies, and employees of the state of Wyoming to cooperate with the commissioner of drugs and substances control in carrying out his functions under this or any other act.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.6.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Stated

in

Combined Ins. Co. of Am. v. Sinclair, 584 P.2d 1034,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 229

(Wyo. 1978).

§ 35-7-1007.
Cooperative arrangements; plant eradication programs; research.

The commissioner of drugs and substances control may, in addition to other powers and duties vested in him by this or any other act:

Cooperate with federal and other state agencies in discharging his responsibilities concerning traffic in drugs and substances;

Arrange for the exchange of information between governmental officials concerning the use and abuse of drugs and substances;

Coordinate and cooperate in training programs on drugs and substances law-enforcement at the local and state level;

Conduct programs of eradication aimed at destroying wild or illicit growth of plant species from which controlled drugs and substances may be extracted;

Coordinate and regulate educational programs designed to prevent and deter misuse and abuse of controlled drugs and substances;

Encourage research into the misuse and abuse of controlled drugs and substances; in connection therewith and in furtherance of his other duties he is authorized to:

Establish methods to assess accurately the effects of controlled drugs and substances and to identify and characterize controlled drugs and substances with potential for abuse;

Make studies and undertake programs of research to:

Develop new or improved approaches, techniques, systems, equipment and devices to strengthen the enforcement of this act;

Determine patterns of misuse and abuse of controlled drugs and substances and the social effects thereof; and

Improve methods of preventing, predicting, understanding, and dealing with the misuse and abuse of controlled drugs and substances.

Enter into contracts with public agencies, institutions of higher education and private organizations or individuals for the purpose of conducting research, demonstrations, or special projects which bear directly on misuse and abuse of controlled drugs and substances.

Enter into contracts for educational and research activities without performance bonds;

Authorize persons engaged in research on the use and effects of drugs and substances to withhold names and other identifying characteristics of persons who are the subjects of such research, such persons who obtain this authorization may not be compelled in any state, civil, criminal, administrative, legislative or other proceeding to identify the subjects of research for which such authorization was obtained;

Authorize the possession and distribution of controlled drugs and substances by persons engaged in research, persons who obtain such authorization shall be exempt from state prosecution for possession and distribution of drugs and substances to the extent authorized by the commissioner.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.7.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1008.
Federal funds and grants; authority of commissioner of drugs and substances control.

Except as otherwise provided by law, the commissioner of drugs and substances control is hereby designated as the agency of the state of Wyoming to accept the provisions of and funds and grants made by or under any act of the congress of the United States providing funds for programs relating to drugs and dangerous substances, and as the agency to administer or supervise the administration of any state plan established or funds received by the state by virtue of any federal statute relating to aid to the states for the purpose of drugs and dangerous substances control; provided, that each acceptance of such federal funds shall be restricted in its effect to the specific situation involved under such acceptance.

The commissioner of drugs and substances control may:

Enter into an agreement with the proper federal agency to procure for the state the benefits of the federal statutes;

Establish a state plan, if required by the federal statute, to qualify the state for the benefits of the federal statute;

Provide for reports to be made to the federal agency as may be required;

Provide for reports to be made to the commissioner of drugs and substances control from local agencies receiving federal funds;

Make surveys and studies in cooperation with other agencies to determine the needs of the state with respect to the application of federal funds;

Establish standards to which agencies must conform in receiving federal funds;

Take such other action as may be necessary to secure the benefits of the federal statutes to the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.8.

§ 35-7-1009.
Federal funds and grants; authority of state treasurer.

Whenever the state of Wyoming shall be entitled to receive any moneys or funds from the United States of America, or from any other source or authority, to be expended for the purposes of this act, the state treasurer is hereby authorized to receive and receipt for such moneys or funds, and to make such application and use of the same as may be required by law.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.9.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

§ 35-7-1010.
Board of pharmacy designated agency to administer registration.

The Wyoming state board of pharmacy in addition to any other duties imposed upon it by law is hereby designated as the agency to administer the registration of the manufacture, distribution and dispensing of controlled substances as hereinafter provided in this act. The board shall register certified animal euthanasia technicians as provided by W.S. 33-30-223(b), for the limited purposes of purchasing, possessing and administering drugs labeled by the manufacturer for the purpose of euthanizing animals, excluding Schedule I drugs as defined in W.S.

35-7-1013

and

35-7-1014

, and performing the duties and powers of a certified animal euthanasia technician.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 10; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.10; 2003, ch. 182, § 2; 2007, ch. 15, § 1; 2013 ch. 127, § 2, effective July 1, 2013; 2014 ch. 79, § 1, effective March 10, 2014.

Cross references. —

As to duties of the state board of pharmacy generally, see §

33-24-145

.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “33-30-216(a)(v)” for “33-30-216(a)(iv)”.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “W.S. 33-20-223(b)” for “W.S. 33-30-219” and “administering drugs labeled by the manufacturer for the purpose of euthanizing animals, excluding Schedule I drugs as defined in W.S.

35-7-1013

and

35-7-1014

” for “administering euthanizing drugs as defined by W.S. 33-30-216(a)(v)” in the second sentence.

The 2014 amendment,

in the second sentence, substituted “33-30-223(b)” for “33-20-223(b).”

Laws 2014, ch. 79, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 10, 2014.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Article III

§ 35-7-1011.
Control of substances.

The commissioner shall administer this act and with the advice of the advisory board established in W.S.

35-7-1005

may add substances to or delete or reschedule all substances enumerated in the schedules in W.S.

35-7-1014

,

35-7-1016

,

35-7-1018

,

35-7-1020

and

35-7-1022

pursuant to the procedures of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act [§§

16-3-101

through

16-3-115

]. In making a determination regarding a substance, the commissioner shall consider the following:

The actual or relative potential for abuse;

The scientific evidence of its pharmacological effect, if known;

The state of current scientific knowledge regarding the substance;

The history and current pattern of abuse;

The scope, duration, and significance of abuse;

The risk to the public health;

The potential of the substance to produce psychic or physiological dependence liability;

Whether the substance is an immediate precursor of a substance already controlled under this article; and

Its other uses, both medical and commercial.

After considering factors enumerated in subsection (a) of this section, the commissioner shall make findings with respect thereto and issue a rule controlling the substance if he finds the substance has a potential for abuse.

If the commissioner designates a substance as an immediate precursor, substances which are precursors of the controlled precursor shall not be subject to control solely because they are precursors of the controlled precursor.

If any substance is designated, rescheduled, or deleted as a controlled substance under federal law the commissioner shall control the substance under this act in the same manner as federal law within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the change but not later than thirty (30) days after the first publication of the change in the Federal Register. Under this subsection, the commissioner shall control the substance in the same manner as federal law through the promulgation of an emergency rule, followed by promulgation of a permanent rule under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. If the commissioner objects to the designation, rescheduling or deletion of a substance, the commissioner shall within the same period required to control the substance publish the reasons for objection and afford all interested parties an opportunity to be heard. At the conclusion of the hearing, the commissioner shall publish his decision which shall be final unless altered by statute. Upon publication of an objection to designation, rescheduling or deletion under this act by the commissioner, control under this act is stayed until the commissioner publishes his final decision. Any final decision that ultimately controls the substance under this act in the same manner as federal law shall be finalized through the promulgation of an emergency rule, followed by promulgation of a permanent rule under the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Authority to control under this section does not extend to distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco.

The commissioner shall exclude any nonnarcotic substance from a schedule if such substance may under the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq., and W.S.

33-24-131

of the Wyoming Pharmacy Act, be lawfully sold over the counter without a prescription.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 11; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.11; Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2019 ch. 173, § 2, effective March 6, 2019.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “21 U.S.C. § 301 et seq. and W.S.

33-24-131

” for “and W.S.

33-24-121

.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2019 amendment,

in (d), substituted “the commissioner shall control” for “and notice thereof is given to the commissioner, the commissioner shall similarly control,” and “in the same manner as federal law within thirty (30) days after receiving notice of the change but not later than thirty (30) days after the first publication of the change in the Federal Register” for “after the expiration of thirty (30) days from publication in the Federal Register of a final order designating a substance as a controlled substance, or rescheduling, or deleting a substance unless within that thirty (30) day period,” added the second sentence, substituted “the designation” for “inclusion,” “of a substance” for “In that case,” “shall within the same period required to control the substance publish” for “shall publish,” “an objection to designation” for “objection to inclusion,” added the last sentence, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2019, ch. 173, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

Editor's notes. —

The bracketed reference to §

33-24-131

has been inserted in subsection (f) as it is the apparent intended reference.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-7-1002(a)(xxviii).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3 provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Products liability: recovery for injury or death resulting from intentional inhalation of product's fumes or vapors to produce intoxicating or similar effect, 50 ALR5th 275.

Equal protection. —

Defendant’s motion to dismiss was properly denied because the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act did not regulate pure thought, it regulated controlled substances, and in defendant’s case, the distribution of a controlled substance. Under the rational basis test, the Wyoming Controlled Substances Act was rationally related to its objectives, and its failure to include distilled spirits, wine, malt beverages, or tobacco did not deny defendant equal protection of the law under the United States Constitution. Hardison v. State, 2022 WY 45, 507 P.3d 36,

2022 Wyo. LEXIS 46

(Wyo. 2022).

§ 35-7-1012.
Name by which controlled substance listed in schedule.

The controlled substances listed or to be listed in the schedules in W.S.

35-7-1014

,

35-7-1016

,

35-7-1018

,

35-7-1020

and

35-7-1022

are included by whatever official, common, usual, chemical, or trade name designated.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 12; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.12.

§ 35-7-1013.
Findings requiring inclusion of substance in Schedule I.

The commissioner shall place a substance in Schedule I if he finds that the substance:

Has high potential for abuse; and

Has no accepted medical use in treatment in the United States or lacks accepted safety for use in treatment under medical supervision.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 246, § 13; W.S. 1957, § 35-347.13.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Cited

in

Burns v. State, 2011 WY 5, 246 P.3d 283,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Jan. 19, 2011).